Utah statutes.
56-2-12.   Liability for railroad's noncompliance with commission's fencing orders.

The failure of any railroad company or corporation to comply with any order of the commission authorized by this act shall not subject such noncomplying railroad company or corporation, or any of its officers, agents or employees, to any of the penalties prescribed in Sections 54-7-25 and 54-7-26, Utah Code Annotated 1953, but shall subject such company or corporation to the liability prescribed by Section 56-1-13, Utah Code Annotated 1953.



No Change Since 1953

